Utah statutes.
53-3-706.   Procedure for home jurisdictions upon report of a licensee's
failure to comply with out-of-state authority.
The following is the procedure for the home jurisdiction:
(1) (a)  Upon receipt of a report of a failure to comply from the licensing
authority of the issuing jurisdiction, the licensing authority of the home
jurisdiction may notify the motorist and initiate a suspension action, in
accordance with the home jurisdiction's procedures, and suspend the motorist's
driver license until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the
traffic citation has been furnished to the home jurisdiction licensing
authority.
(b)  Due process safeguards will be accorded.
(2)  The licensing authority of the home jurisdiction shall maintain a record
of actions taken and make reports to issuing jurisdictions as provided in the
compact manual.
